Maryland, session 2025, SB0057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
5–803.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible dependent” means a veteran’s spouse, a veteran’s unmarried
child under the age of 21 years, or a veteran’s unmarried adult child who before the age of
21 became permanently incapable of self–support because of physical or mental disability.
(3) (i) “Identifying information” means data required by a veterans
service organization to verify the eligibility of a veteran or an eligible dependent for burial
in a national or state veterans cemetery.
(ii) “Identifying information” includes name, service number, Social
Security number, date of birth, date of death, place of birth, and copy of the death
certificate.
– 1 –

Ch. 362 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government
Article.
(5) “Veterans service organization” means an association or other entity
organized for the benefit of veterans that has been recognized by the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs or chartered by Congress and any employee or representative of the
association or entity.
(b) (1) If a licensed funeral establishment or a crematory is in possession of
cremated human remains or hydrolyzed remains that have been unclaimed for 90 days or
more, the licensed funeral establishment or holder of the permit for the business of
operating a crematory shall provide identifying information of the unclaimed cremains or
hydrolyzed remains to a veterans service organization in order for the veterans service
organization to determine if the unclaimed cremains or hydrolyzed remains are those of a
veteran or an eligible dependent.
(2) (i) Subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph does not apply if:
1. an authorizing agent directs otherwise; or
2. a reduction facility reasonably concludes based on the
identifying information or other evidence that a decedent does not qualify for disposition
benefits associated with veterans status.
(ii) A reduction facility in possession of human remains that are
being processed by natural organic reduction shall provide identifying information to a
veterans service organization within 5 business days after natural organic reduction is
initiated to determine if the soil remains are those of a veteran or an eligible dependent.
(c) Within 45 days after receipt of the information required by subsection (b) of
this section, the veterans service organization shall notify the licensed funeral
establishment, permit holder, or reduction facility:
(1) whether the cremains, hydrolyzed remains, or soil remains are those of
a veteran or an eligible dependent; and
(2) if so, whether the veteran or eligible dependent is eligible for burial in
a veterans cemetery.
(d) If the unclaimed cremains or hydrolyzed remains are those of a veteran or an
eligible dependent, the licensed funeral establishment or permit holder may transfer the
cremains to a veterans service organization for the purpose of disposition of the cremains
or hydrolyzed remains.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 362
(e) If the unclaimed soil remains are those of a veteran or an eligible dependent,
the reduction facility may:
(1) transfer a portion of the soil remains not exceeding 300 cubic inches in
volume to a veterans service organization that grants permission for the purpose of
disposition; and
(2) if authorized by the cemetery or owner, transfer the balance of soil
remains to a cemetery or the owner of a woodland protected under the Forest Conservation
Act.
(F) IF A VETERANS SERVICE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT TAKE POSSESSION
OF UNCLAIMED CREMAINS OR HYDROLYZED REMAINS THAT QUALIFY FOR A PLOT IN
A STATE VETERANS CEMETERY UNDER § 9–906 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT OR
PERMIT HOLDER RECEIVES THE NOTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION, THE LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT OR PERMIT HOLDER
SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES OF THE STATUS OF THE CREMAINS OR HYDROLYZED REMAINS FOR THE
PURPOSE OF THE APPROPRIATE DISPOSITION OF THE CREMAINS OR HYDROLYZED
REMAINS; AND
(2) TRANSFER THE CREMAINS OR HYDROLYZED REMAINS TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES FOR THE PURPOSE OF THE
APPROPRIATE DISPOSITION OF THE CREMAINS OR HYDROLYZED REMAINS.
(G) IF A VETERANS SERVICE ORGANIZATION DOES NOT TAKE POSSESSION
OF A PORTION OF UNCLAIMED SOIL REMAINS UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS
SECTION THAT QUALIFIES FOR A PLOT IN A STATE VETERANS CEMETERY UNDER §
9–906 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE
REDUCTION FACILITY RECEIVES THE NOTIFICATION, THE REDUCTION FACILITY
SHALL:
(1) NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES OF THE STATUS OF THE SOIL REMAINS FOR THE PURPOSE OF THE
APPROPRIATE DISPOSITION OF THE SOIL REMAINS;
(2) TRANSFER THE SOIL REMAINS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES FOR THE PURPOSE OF THE APPROPRIATE
DISPOSITION OF THE SOIL REMAINS; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 362 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) IF AUTHORIZED BY THE CEMETERY OR OWNER, TRANSFER THE
BALANCE OF THE SOIL REMAINS TO A CEMETERY OR THE OWNER OF A WOODLAND
PROTECTED UNDER THE FOREST CONSERVATION ACT.
Article – Health Occupations
7–406.
(b) (2) (i) If a licensed funeral establishment or a crematory is in
possession of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed remains that have been unclaimed
for 90 days or more, the licensed funeral establishment or holder of the permit for the
business of operating a crematory shall provide identifying information of the unclaimed
cremains or hydrolyzed remains to a veterans service organization in order for the veterans
service organization to determine if the unclaimed cremains OR HYDROLYZED REMAINS
are those of a veteran or an eligible dependent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –